Utah statutes.
16-16-1103.   Power of estate of member.
Unless the organic rules provide for greater rights, if a member is
dissociated because of death, dies, or is expelled by reason of being adjudged
incompetent, the member's personal representative or other legal
representative may exercise the rights of a transferee of the member's
financial rights and, for purposes of settling the estate of a deceased
member, may exercise the informational rights of a current member to obtain
information under Section 16-16-505.
